Nebraska, session 109, LB469.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB469 LB469
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1401 Sections 76-1401 to 76-1449 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act.
Sec. 2. (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the State Court
Administrator shall prepare a form to be included in eviction notices
under the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act. The form shall
include information about available legal assistance, financial
resources, and information on how to report housing discrimination. The
administrator shall make the form available on the Supreme Court's
website.
(2) Beginning February 1, 2026, each time a landlord provides notice
of an eviction to a tenant, the landlord shall include the form provided
for in this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-